Wisconsin, session 2025, AB915.
do enact as follows:AB915,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:AB915,2,8371.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 4(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (4y), (5f), 5(5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and not passed through by a 6partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 7that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 8under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB915,29Section 2. 71.07 (4y) of the statutes is created to read:AB915,2,111071.07 (4y) Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement 11credit. (a) Definitions. In this subsection:AB915,2,13121. “Claimant” means a qualifying small business that files a claim under this 13subsection.AB915,2,17142. “Covered employee” means an individual who is employed in this state by a 15qualifying small business and who accepts the individual coverage health 16reimbursement arrangement offered by the qualifying small business for the plan 17year that begins in the taxable year.AB915,3,2183. “Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement” means a health 1reimbursement arrangement that satisfies the conditions of 26 CFR 54.9802-4, 29 2CFR 2590.702-2, and 45 CFR 146.123.AB915,3,534. “Qualifying small business” means an employer that employs at least one 4and no more than 50 employees during the taxable year and that offers an 5individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement to employees.AB915,3,96(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 7subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 8credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the amount of the tax, an 9amount equal to $400 per covered employee.AB915,3,1210(c) Limitations and conditions. 1. No credit is allowed under par. (b) unless 11the claimant contributes, during the taxable year, at least $400 per covered 12employee to an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement.AB915,3,19132. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 14not claim the credit under par. (b), but the eligibility for, and the amount of, the 15credit are based on their payment of the contributions in subd. 1. A partnership, 16limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 17credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 18provide that information to each of them. The partners, members, and 19shareholders may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB915,3,2120(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (g) and (h), as it applies to the credit 21under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB915,322Section 3. 71.10 (4) (em) of the statutes is created to read:AB915,3,242371.10 (4) (em) Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement credit 24under s. 71.07 (4y).AB915,41Section 4. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 2is amended to read:AB915,4,6371.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 471.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 5(4y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and passed through to 6partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.AB915,57Section 5. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 815, is amended to read:AB915,4,14971.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 10(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), 11(5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 12liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 13partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 14s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB915,615Section 6. 71.28 (4y) of the statutes is created to read:AB915,4,171671.28 (4y) Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement 17credit. (a) Definitions. In this subsection:AB915,4,19181. “Claimant” means a qualifying small business that files a claim under this 19subsection.AB915,4,23202. “Covered employee” means an individual who is employed in this state by a 21qualifying small business and who accepts the individual coverage health 22reimbursement arrangement offered by the qualifying small business for the plan 23year that begins in the taxable year.AB915,5,2243. “Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement” means a health 1reimbursement arrangement that satisfies the conditions of 26 CFR 54.9802-4, 29 2CFR 2590.702-2, and 45 CFR 146.123.AB915,5,534. “Qualifying small business” means an employer that employs at least one 4and no more than 50 employees during the taxable year and that offers an 5individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement to employees.AB915,5,96(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 7subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 8credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the amount of the tax, an 9amount equal to $400 per covered employee.AB915,5,1210(c) Limitations and conditions. 1. No credit is allowed under par. (b) unless 11the claimant contributes, during the taxable year, at least $400 per covered 12employee to an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement.AB915,5,19132. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 14not claim the credit under par. (b), but the eligibility for, and the amount of, the 15credit are based on their payment of the contributions in subd. 1. A partnership, 16limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 17credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 18provide that information to each of them. The partners, members, and 19shareholders may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB915,5,2120(d) Administration. Subsection (4) (g) and (h), as it applies to the credit under 21sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB915,722Section 7. 71.30 (3) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB915,5,242371.30 (3) (am) Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement credit 24under s. 71.28 (4y).AB915,81Section 8. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:AB915,6,6371.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 4corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 5(3wm), (3y), (4), (4y), (5), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and 6passed through to shareholders.AB915,97Section 9. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 815, is amended to read:AB915,6,15971.45 (2) (a) 10. By adding to federal taxable income the amount of credit 10computed under s. 71.47 (1dm) to (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3w), (3y), (4y), (5f), 11(5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and not passed through by a 12partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 13that amount to the partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option 14corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g) and the amount of credit 15computed under s. 71.47 (3), (3t), (4), (4m), and (5).AB915,1016Section 10. 71.47 (4y) of the statutes is created to read:AB915,6,181771.47 (4y) Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement 18credit. (a) Definitions. In this subsection:AB915,6,20191. “Claimant” means a qualifying small business that files a claim under this 20subsection.AB915,6,24212. “Covered employee” means an individual who is employed in this state by a 22qualifying small business and who accepts the individual coverage health 23reimbursement arrangement offered by the qualifying small business for the plan 24year that begins in the taxable year.AB915,7,313. “Individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement” means a health 2reimbursement arrangement that satisfies the conditions of 26 CFR 54.9802-4, 29 3CFR 2590.702-2, and 45 CFR 146.123.AB915,7,644. “Qualifying small business” means an employer that employs at least one 5and no more than 50 employees during the taxable year and that offers an 6individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement to employees.AB915,7,107(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 8subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 9credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.43, up to the amount of the tax, an 10amount equal to $400 per covered employee.AB915,7,1311(c) Limitations and conditions. 1. No credit is allowed under par. (b) unless 12the claimant contributes, during the taxable year, at least $400 per covered 13employee to an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement.AB915,7,20142. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 15not claim the credit under par. (b), but the eligibility for, and the amount of, the 16credit are based on their payment of the contributions in subd. 1. A partnership, 17limited liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of 18credit that each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall 19provide that information to each of them. The partners, members, and 20shareholders may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB915,7,2221(d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (g) and (h), as it applies to the credit 22under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab915 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab915 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB915 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB915 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB915: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting